Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-964
Community colleges; academic course instruction authorized.

The community colleges may provide such academic course instruction as may be necessary to support applied technology education and academic transfer programs.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 48;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 18.